lexc/noun/enhufnspec.lexc
LEXICON Posstsz
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famtsz;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famtsz;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famtsz;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famtsz;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famtsz;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famtsz;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famtsz;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famtsz;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famtsz;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famtsz;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famtsz;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famtsz;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famtsz;

LEXICON Plurtsz
+Plur:^+cPlur^0    Gentsz;
                            Gentsz;
        
LEXICON Famtsz
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gentsz;
                       Gentsz;

LEXICON Gentsz
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casetsz;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casetsz;
                       Casetsz;
 
LEXICON Casetsz
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

! -val/vel vá/vé kötőjellel kirchhoff-fal
LEXICON AddNounkot
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posskot;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurkot;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famkot1;

LEXICON Posskot
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famkot;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famkot;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famkot;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famkot;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famkot;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famkot;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famkot;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famkot;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famkot;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famkot;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famkot;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famkot;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famkot1;

LEXICON Plurkot
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genkot;
                            Genkot1;
        
LEXICON Famkot
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genkot;
                       Genkot;
LEXICON Famkot1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genkot;
                       Genkot1;

LEXICON Genkot
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casekot;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casekot;
                       Casekot;
LEXICON Genkot1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casekot;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casekot;
                       Casekot1;
 
LEXICON Casekot
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Casekot1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§NNn§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§NNn§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§RRr§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VVKOT§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VVKOT§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§RRr§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

! Dunaferrt
LEXICON AddNountr
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Casetr;

LEXICON Casetr
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t               #;  ! 

! csak ragozás, plur, fam
LEXICON AddNounja
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurja;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famja;

LEXICON Plurja
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genja;
                            Genja;
        
LEXICON Famja
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genja;
                       Genja;

LEXICON Genja
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseja;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseja;
                       Caseja;

LEXICON Caseja
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t      #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

! uses famja
LEXICON AddNounjapl
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possjapl;

LEXICON Possjapl
!+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
!+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
!+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famja;   ! m
!+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famja;   ! d
!+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famja;   ! ja, je, a,e
!+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famja;   ! unk, ünk
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famja;   ! etek, atok
!+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famja;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^im   Famja;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^id   Famja;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^i   Famja;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^ink   Famja;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^it§OEOE2§k   Famja;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^ik   Famja;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                           Famja;


LEXICON AddNounszerette
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possszerette;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurszerette;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famszerette;

LEXICON Noun
Access AddNounkot;
Beatles AddNounkot;
Beckett AddNounkot;
Bell AddNounkot;
Böll AddNounkot;
Chagall AddNounkot;
Cromwell AddNounkot;
Dunaferr AddNounkot;
Dunaferr AddNountr;
Dürrenmatt AddNounkot;
Gauss AddNounkot;
Grimm AddNounkot;
Guinness AddNounkot;
Hermann AddNounkot;
Herrmann AddNounkot;
Hoffmann AddNounkot;
Hofmann AddNounkot;
Hunspell AddNounkot;
Impress AddNounkot;
Ispell AddNounkot;
Kirchhoff AddNounkot;
Mann AddNounkot;
Maxwell AddNounkot;
Myspell AddNounkot;
Neumann AddNounkot;
Novell AddNounkot;
Riemann AddNounkot;
Russell AddNounkot;
Scott AddNounkot;
Tell AddNounkot;
Watt AddNounkot;
Weierstrass AddNounkot;
Zeiss AddNounkot;
alja:legalja AddNounja;
apjaura AddNounja;
apádurad AddNounja;
apámuram AddNounja;
belső:legbelseje AddNounja;
benső:benseje AddNounja;
benső:legbenseje AddNounja;
bátyjaura AddNounja;
bátyádurad AddNounja;
bátyámuram AddNounja;
első:eleje AddNounja;
felkelte:felkelt AddNounszerette;
fiadurad AddNounja;
fiamuram AddNounja;
fiaura AddNounja;
fölkelte:fölkelt AddNounszerette;
gazdura AddNounja;
gazdurad AddNounja;
gazduram AddNounja;
három:hármója AddNounja;
három:hármójuk AddNounja;
ipadurad AddNounja;
ipamuram AddNounja;
ipaura AddNounja;
jó:java AddNounja;
jó:legjava AddNounja;
kelte:kelt AddNounszerette;
kettő:ketteje AddNounja;
kettő:kettejük AddNounja;
kevés:keves AddNounszerette;
komaura AddNounja;
komádurad AddNounja;
komámuram AddNounja;
legelső:legeleje AddNounja;
leülte:leült AddNounszerette;
létrejötte:létrejött AddNounszerette;
miasszonyunk AddNounja;
mély:legmélye AddNounja;
neheze AddNounja;
netovábbja AddNounja;
nyugta:nyugt AddNounszerette;
négy:négyőjük AddNounja;
népszava AddNounja;
odaérte:odaért AddNounszerette;
szerette:szerett AddNounszerette;
telje AddNounja;
telje:telé AddNounjapl;
tető:legteteje AddNounja;
térte:tért AddNounszerette;
visszatérte:visszatért AddNounszerette;
visszaérte:visszaért AddNounszerette;
visszája AddNounja;
visszája:visszá AddNounjapl;
vég:legvége AddNounja;
zárta AddNounja;
öccseura AddNounja;
öcsédurad AddNounja;
öcsémuram AddNounja;
